Maryland, session 2025, SB0719.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article 20 – Somerset County
SUBTITLE 4. EMERGENCY SERVICES TAX.
7–401.
(A) THE COUNTY COMMISSIONERS MAY IMPOSE, BY LAW, AN ANNUAL
PROPERTY TAX ON ALL PROPERTY SUBJECT TO THE COUNTY PROPERTY TAX TO PAY
ALL OR PART OF THE COSTS OF EMERGENCY SERVICES IN THE COUNTY, INCLUDING
FIRE, RESCUE, AND EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES.
(B) (1) THE EMERGENCY SERVICES TAX SHALL BE COLLECTED IN THE
SAME MANNER AS OTHER COUNTY TAXES ARE COLLECTED.
(2) IF A PROPERTY OWNER FAILS TO PAY THE EMERGENCY SERVICES
TAX WHEN DUE AND PAYABLE, THE UNPAID TAX SHALL:
(I) BE A LIEN ON ALL PROPERTY BELONGING TO THE PERSON
REQUIRED TO MAKE PAYMENT; AND
– 1 –

Ch. 70 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(II) ACCRUE INTEREST AND PENALTIES AT THE SAME RATE AND
IN THE SAME MANNER AS THE ACCRUAL OF INTEREST AND PENALTIES FOR UNPAID
COUNTY PROPERTY TAXES.
(3) PROPERTY MAY BE SOLD IN ACCORDANCE WITH TITLE 14,
SUBTITLE 8 OF THE TAX – PROPERTY ARTICLE TO ENFORCE THE EMERGENCY
SERVICES TAX.
(C) (1) THE COUNTY COMMISSIONERS MAY NOT ENACT A LAW TO
INITIALLY IMPOSE OR SUBSEQUENTLY INCREASE AN EMERGENCY SERVICES TAX
UNTIL AFTER A PUBLIC HEARING IS HELD ON THE PROPOSED LAW AT THE SAME
TIME AS THE COUNTY’S ANNUAL BUDGET HEARING.
(2) THE COUNTY SHALL PROVIDE THE PUBLIC WITH ADVANCE
NOTICE OF THE HEARING REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after June 30, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, April 8, 2025.
– 2 –